Florida, session 2026, SB1594.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âPresent subsections (3) through (9) of section 15 402.33, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (4) 16 through (10), respectively, and a new subsection (3) is added to 17 that section, to read: 18 402.33âDepartment authority to charge fees for services 19 provided.â 20 (3)âThe department may access benefit payments provided by 21 the United States Department of Veterans Affairs which are in a 22 combined account for postsecondary education services and 23 support and aftercare services under s. 409.1451 when a minor 24 client attains 18 years of age or, if enrolled in school, 23 25 years of age; however, the department may not supplant financial 26 assistance provided in 409.1451(2)(b). 27 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.